el: Τύπος δακτυλίου ανάρτησης: Σινεμπλόκ βάσης αμαξώματος; Σινεμπλόκ ψαλιδιού; Σινεμπλόκ βάσης διαφορικού; Σινεμπλόκ βάσης κινητήρα; Σινεμπλόκ άκρου σούστας; Σινεμπλόκ ράβδου Panhard / ράβδου οδήγησης; Σινεμπλόκ συνδετήρα (shackle); Σινεμπλόκ αμορτισέρ; Σινεμπλόκ ελατηρίου (σπειροειδές/απομονωτήρας); Σινεμπλόκ κρεμαγιέρας; Σινεμπλόκ ράβδου στήριξης / βραχίονα ακτίνας; Σινεμπλόκ υποπλαισίου; Σινεμπλόκ αντιστρεπτικής δοκού; Σινεμπλόκ υστερούντα βραχίονα; Σινεμπλόκ βάσης σασμάν; Σινεμπλόκ γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta puše vzmetenja: Puša za pritrditev karoserije; Puša krmilne roke; Puša za pritrditev diferenciala; Puša za pritrditev motorja; Puša za listnate vzmeti; Puša za Panhardov drog; Puša obeska; Puša blažilnika; Puša vzmeti (vijačna / izolator); Puša zobate letve; Puša stabilizatorja / vzdolžne roke; Puša pomožnega okvirja; Puša stabilizatorja; Puša vzdolžne krmilne roke; Puša za pritrditev menjalnika; Univerzalna puša; Drugo
zh-TW: 懸吊襯套類型: 車身安裝襯套; 控制臂襯套; 差速器安裝襯套; 引擎腳襯套; 葉片彈簧孔襯套; 潘哈桿/橫向拉桿襯套; 吊架襯套; 避震器襯套; 彈簧襯套 (線圈/隔離器); 轉向齒條襯套; 支柱桿/半徑臂襯套; 副車架襯套; 防傾桿襯套; 拖曳臂襯套; 變速箱腳襯套; 通用襯套; 其他
ru: Тип втулки подвески: Сайлентблок крепления кузова; Сайлентблок рычага подвески; Сайлентблок крепления дифференциала; Сайлентблок крепления двигателя; Втулка ушка рессоры; Втулка тяги Панара / поперечной тяги; Втулка серьги рессоры; Втулка амортизатора; Изолятор/прокладка пружины; Втулка рулевой рейки; Сайлентблок продольной тяги / реактивной тяги; Сайлентблок подрамника; Втулка стабилизатора поперечной устойчивости; Сайлентблок продольного рычага; Сайлентблок опоры коробки передач; Универсальная втулка; Другое
bg-BG: Тип втулка на окачването: Тампон за купето; Тампон за носач; Тампон за диференциал; Тампон за двигател; Тампон за ресор; Тампон за панхард щанга / напречна щанга; Тампон за обеца на ресор; Тампон за амортисьор; Тампон за пружина (спирала/изолатор); Тампон за кормилна рейка; Тампон за надлъжна щанга; Тампон за подрамка; Тампон за стабилизираща щанга; Тампон за заден носач; Тампон за скоростна кутия; Универсален тампон; Друго
zh-CN: 悬挂衬套类型: 车身支架衬套; 控制臂衬套; 差速器支架衬套; 发动机支架衬套; 钢板弹簧孔衬套; 潘哈德杆/推力杆衬套; 吊耳衬套; 减震器衬套; 弹簧衬套（螺旋弹簧/隔离器）; 转向齿条衬套; 支柱杆/半径臂衬套; 副车架衬套; 稳定杆衬套; 拖曳臂衬套; 变速箱支架衬套; 通用衬套; 其他
nb: Type fjæringsbøssing: Karosserifôring; Bærearmsfôring; Differensialfôring; Motorfestefôring; Bladfjærfôring; Panhardstag- / sporstagfôring; Sjakkelfôring; Støtdemperfôring; Fjærfôring (spiral/isolator); Tannstangfôring; Støttestag- / radiusarmfôring; Hjelperammefôring; Stabilisatorstagfôring; Langsbærearmsfôring; Girkassefestefôring; Universalfôring; Annet
sv: Typ av upphängningsbussning: Bussning för karossfäste; Bärarmsbussning; Bussning för differentialfäste; Motorfästesbussning; Bladfjäderbussning; Panhardstag- / track bar-bussning; Fjäderhängebussning; Stötdämparbussning; Fjäderbussning (spiral/isolator); Styrväxelbussning; Stötdämparstag- / radiusarmsbussning; Bussning för subframe; Krängningshämmarbussning; Bärarmsbussning (längsgående); Växellådsfästesbussning; Universalbussning; Övrigt
th: บูชช่วงล่างชนิด: บูชรองตัวถัง; บูชปีกนก; บูชแท่นเฟืองท้าย; บูชแท่นเครื่อง; บูชหูแหนบ; บูชกันเซ / บูชแทร็กบาร์; บูชโตงเตง; บูชหูโช้ค; บูชสปริง (คอยล์/ยางรอง); บูชแร็คพวงมาลัย; บูชหนวดกุ้ง / บูชอาร์มหลัง; บูชซับเฟรม; บูชกันโคลง; บูชเทรลลิงอาร์ม; บูชแท่นเกียร์; บูชอเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Bucha de suspensão tipo: Bucha do suporte da carroceria; Bucha da bandeja de suspensão; Bucha do suporte do diferencial; Bucha do coxim do motor; Bucha do olhal do feixe de molas; Bucha da barra Panhard / barra de tração; Bucha do jumelo; Bucha do amortecedor; Bucha da mola (helicoidal/isolador); Bucha da caixa de direção; Bucha do braço tensor / braço oscilante; Bucha do quadro da suspensão; Bucha da barra estabilizadora; Bucha do braço arrastado; Bucha do coxim do câmbio; Bucha universal; Outras
pt-PT: Tipo de casquilho da suspensão: Casquilho de suporte da carroçaria; Casquilho do braço de suspensão; Casquilho de suporte do diferencial; Casquilho de suporte do motor; Casquilho de olhal de mola de lâminas; Casquilho da barra Panhard/barra estabilizadora; Casquilho de manilha; Casquilho do amortecedor; Casquilho de mola (espiral/isolador); Casquilho da cremalheira de direção; Casquilho do tirante/braço oscilante; Casquilho do subchassi; Casquilho da barra estabilizadora; Casquilho do braço longitudinal; Casquilho de suporte da transmissão; Casquilho universal; Outro
nl: Ophangingsbus type: Carrosserierubber; Draagarmrubber; Differentieelrubber; Motorsteunrubber; Bladveeroogrubber; Panhardstang- / spoorstangrubber; Veerschommelrubber; Schokdemperrubber; Veerrubber (spiraal/isolator); Stuurhuisrubber; Reactiestang- / trekstangrubber; Subframerubber; Stabilisatorstangrubber; Draagarmrubber achter; Versnellingsbakrubber; Universeel rubber; Overig
ro-RO: Tipul bucșei de suspensie: Bucșă montare caroserie; Bucșă braț de suspensie; Bucșă montare diferențial; Bucșă suport motor; Bucșă ochi arc lamelar; Bucșă bară Panhard / bară de ghidare; Bucșă bridă; Bucșă amortizor; Bucșă arc (elicoidal/izolator); Bucșă casetă de direcție; Bucșă braț de tracțiune; Bucșă subcadru; Bucșă bară stabilizatoare; Bucșă braț longitudinal; Bucșă suport transmisie; Bucșă universală; Altele
it: Tipo di boccola di sospensione: Boccola di montaggio carrozzeria; Boccola braccio di controllo; Boccola di supporto differenziale; Boccola di supporto motore; Boccola occhio balestra; Boccola barra Panhard/barra di convergenza; Boccola biscottino balestra; Boccola ammortizzatore; Boccola molla (spirale/isolatore); Boccola cremagliera dello sterzo; Boccola tirante/braccio di reazione; Boccola telaietto; Boccola barra stabilizzatrice; Boccola braccio longitudinale; Boccola di supporto cambio; Boccola universale; Altro
en: Suspension bushing type: Body mount bushing; Control arm bushing; Differential mount bushing; Engine mount bushing; Leaf spring eye bushing; Panhard bar / track bar bushing; Shackle bushing; Shock absorber bushing; Spring bushing (coil/isolator); Steering rack bushing; Strut rod / radius arm bushing; Subframe bushing; Sway bar bushing; Trailing arm bushing; Transmission mount bushing; Universal bushing; Other
lt-LT: Pakabos įvorės tipas: Kėbulo tvirtinimo įvorė; Pakabos svirties įvorė; Diferencialo tvirtinimo įvorė; Variklio pagalvės įvorė; Lingės ąsos įvorė; Panhard / skersinės traukės įvorė; Pakabos lanko įvorė; Amortizatoriaus įvorė; Spyruoklės įvorė (ritė / izoliatorius); Vairo kolonėlės įvorė; Išilginės svirties įvorė; Porėmio įvorė; Stabilizatoriaus įvorė; Galinės išilginės svirties įvorė; Transmisijos tvirtinimo įvorė; Universali įvorė; Kita
de: Typ der Aufhängungsbuchse: Karosserielagerbuchse; Querlenkerbuchse; Differentiallagerbuchse; Motorlagerbuchse; Blattfederaugenbuchse; Panhardstab- / Spurstangenbuchse; Federbügelbuchse; Stoßdämpferbuchse; Federbuchse (Schraubenfeder/Isolator); Lenkgetriebebuchse; Zugstreben- / Längslenkerbuchse; Hilfsrahmenbuchse; Stabilisatorbuchse; Längslenkerbuchse; Getriebelagerbuchse; Universalbuchse; Sonstige
ja: サスペンションブッシュタイプ: ボディマウントブッシュ; コントロールアームブッシュ; デフマウントブッシュ; エンジンマウントブッシュ; リーフスプリングアイブッシュ; パンハードロッド/トラックバーブッシュ; シャックルブッシュ; ショックアブソーバーブッシュ; スプリングブッシュ (コイル/アイソレーター); ステアリングラックブッシュ; ストラットロッド/ラジアスアームブッシュ; サブフレームブッシュ; スウェイバーブッシュ; トレーリングアームブッシュ; トランスミッションマウントブッシュ; 汎用ブッシュ; その他
es: Tipo de buje de suspensión: Buje de soporte de carrocería; Buje de brazo de control; Buje de soporte del diferencial; Buje de soporte de motor; Buje del ojo de ballesta; Buje de barra Panhard o barra de tracción; Buje de grillete; Buje de amortiguador; Buje de resorte (helicoidal o aislador); Buje de cremallera de dirección; Buje de varilla tensora o brazo tensor; Buje de subchasis; Buje de barra estabilizadora; Buje de brazo de arrastre; Buje de soporte de transmisión; Buje universal; Otro
fr: Type de silentbloc de suspension: Silentbloc de carrosserie; Silentbloc de bras de suspension; Silentbloc de différentiel; Silentbloc de support moteur; Silentbloc d’œil de ressort à lames; Silentbloc de barre Panhard / barre d’accouplement; Silentbloc de jumelle; Silentbloc d’amortisseur; Silentbloc de ressort (hélicoïdal/isolateur); Silentbloc de crémaillère de direction; Silentbloc de tirant de chasse / bras tiré; Silentbloc de berceau; Silentbloc de barre stabilisatrice; Silentbloc de bras oscillant; Silentbloc de support de transmission; Silentbloc universel; Autre
da: Type af affjedringsbøsning: Karosseribøsning; Bærearmsbøsning; Differentialebøsning; Motorophængsbøsning; Bladfjederbøsning; Panhard-stang / tværstangsbøsning; Sjækelbøsning; Støddæmperbøsning; Fjederbøsning (skruefjeder/isolator); Tandstangsbøsning; Stræberarmsbøsning; Hjælperammebøsning; Krængningsstabilisatorbøsning; Langsgående bærearmsbøsning; Gearkasseophængsbøsning; Universalbøsning; Andet
ko: 서스펜션 부싱 유형: 차체 마운트 부싱; 컨트롤 암 부싱; 디퍼렌셜 마운트 부싱; 엔진 마운트 부싱; 리프 스프링 아이 부싱; 팬하드 바/트랙 바 부싱; 섀클 부싱; 쇼크 업소버 부싱; 스프링 부싱(코일/아이솔레이터); 스티어링 랙 부싱; 스트럿 로드/래디어스 암 부싱; 서브프레임 부싱; 스웨이 바 부싱; 트레일링 암 부싱; 트랜스미션 마운트 부싱; 범용 부싱; 기타
cs: Typ pouzdra pro zavěšení: Silentblok uložení karoserie; Silentblok ramene nápravy; Silentblok diferenciálu; Silentblok motoru; Silentblok listového pera; Silentblok panhardské tyče; Silentblok třmenu listového pera; Silentblok tlumiče; Silentblok pružiny (vinutá / izolátor); Silentblok hřebenu řízení; Silentblok vzpěry / vodicího ramene; Silentblok nápravnice; Silentblok stabilizátoru; Silentblok vlečného ramene; Silentblok převodovky; Univerzální silentblok; Jiné
hr-HR: Vrsta čahure ovjesa: Čahura nosača karoserije; Čahura upravljačke ruke (vilice); Čahura nosača diferencijala; Čahura nosača motora; Čahura oka lisnate opruge; Čahura Panhardove / stabilizacijske poluge; Čahura okova opruge; Čahura amortizera; Čahura opruge (zavojnica/izolator); Čahura letve volana; Čahura spone / uporne ruke; Čahura podokvira; Čahura balans štange; Čahura uzdužne vilice; Čahura nosača mjenjača; Univerzalna čahura; Ostalo
fi: Jousituksen puslan tyyppi: Korin kiinnityshela; Tukivarren hela; Tasauspyörästön kiinnityshela; Moottorin kiinnityshela; Lehtijousen silmukan hela; Panhard-tangon hela; Riipukkeen hela; Iskunvaimentimen hela; Jousen hela (kierrejousi/eristin); Ohjausvaihteen hela; Reaktiotangon hela; Apurungon hela; Kallistuksenvakaajan hela; Pitkittäistukivarren hela; Vaihteiston kiinnityshela; Yleismallinen hela; Muu
tr: Süspansiyon burç tipi: Gövde takoz burcu; Salıncak burcu; Diferansiyel takoz burcu; Motor takoz burcu; Makas burcu; Panhard çubuğu / denge çubuğu burcu; Küpe burcu; Amortisör burcu; Yay burcu (helezon/izolatör); Direksiyon kutusu burcu; Gergi kolu / denge kolu burcu; Alt şasi burcu; Viraj demiri burcu; Arka salıncak burcu; Şanzıman takoz burcu; Evrensel burç; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ závesného puzdra: Silentblok uloženia karosérie; Silentblok ramena nápravy; Silentblok uloženia diferenciálu; Silentblok uloženia motora; Silentblok oka listového pera; Silentblok Panhardskej tyče; Silentblok závesu pera; Silentblok tlmiča; Uloženie pružiny (vinutá pružina/izolátor); Silentblok hrebeňa riadenia; Silentblok vzpery / vodiaceho ramena; Silentblok nápravnice; Silentblok stabilizátora; Silentblok vlečeného ramena; Silentblok uloženia prevodovky; Univerzálny silentblok; Iné
hu: Felfüggesztés csapágy típusa: Karosszériatartó szilent; Lengőkar szilent; Differenciálmű-tartó szilent; Motortartó szilent; Laprugó-szem szilent; Panhard-rúd / nyomtávrúd szilent; Rugókengyel szilent; Lengéscsillapító szilent; Rugószilent (tekercs/szigetelő); Kormánymű szilent; Támrúd / sugárkar szilent; Segédkeret szilent; Stabilizátorrúd szilent; Hosszlengőkar szilent; Váltótartó szilent; Univerzális szilent; Egyéb
pl: Typ tulei zawieszenia: Tuleja mocowania karoserii; Tuleja wahacza; Tuleja mocowania dyferencjału; Tuleja mocowania silnika; Tuleja ucha resoru piórowego; Tuleja drążka Panharda / drążka poprzecznego; Tuleja wieszaka resoru; Tuleja amortyzatora; Tuleja sprężyny (śrubowa/izolator); Tuleja przekładni kierowniczej; Tuleja drążka reakcyjnego; Tuleja ramy pomocniczej (sanek); Tuleja drążka stabilizatora; Tuleja wahacza wleczonego; Tuleja mocowania skrzyni biegów; Tuleja uniwersalna; Inna
vi: Loại ống lót giảm xóc: Bạc lót ngàm gầm xe; Bạc lót càng chữ A; Bạc lót giá đỡ bộ vi sai; Bạc lót chân máy; Bạc lót nhíp lá; Bạc lót thanh Panhard / thanh giằng ngang; Bạc lót quang nhíp; Bạc lót bộ giảm xóc; Bạc lót lò xo (cuộn/bộ cách ly); Bạc lót thước lái; Bạc lót thanh chống / càng kéo; Bạc lót khung phụ; Bạc lót thanh cân bằng; Bạc lót càng dọc; Bạc lót hộp số; Bạc lót đa năng; Khác